Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.070

Format, layout, contents. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet published under RCW 29A.32.010. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW 29A.72.290.

The secretary of state's name may not appear in the voters' pamphlet in his or her official capacity if the secretary is a candidate for office during the same year. His or her name may only be included as part of the information normally included for candidates.

The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot title of the measure;

(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;

(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29A.72.025;

(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on the ballot measure;

(10) The full text of the measure.

[ 2023 c 109 s 2; 2016 c 83 s 1; 2009 c 415 s 5. Prior: 2008 c 1 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 960, approved November 6, 2007); 2003 c 111 s 807; prior: 2002 c 139 s 2; 1999 c 260 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.81.250.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: "The legislature finds that making the act of casting a ballot as simple as possible will help promote the free and equal elections guaranteed by Article I, section 19 and Article VI, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution. The legislature recognizes that transparency and fiscal responsibility are important to the people of Washington, and that election administration and ballot design should reflect these long-held values. The legislature further finds that the people rightfully expect items on their ballots to be neutrally and accurately worded. Finally, the legislature finds for the votes that Washingtonians cast to have meaning, the ballot must be limited to candidate elections that give the people the power to choose their representatives or ballot measures that determine what laws and plan of government the state and its localities shall have." [ 2023 c 109 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—Construction—Severability—Subheadings and part headings not law—Short title—Effective date—2008 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 960): See notes following RCW 43.135.031.

PDFRCW 29A.32.070

Format, layout, contents. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet published under RCW 29A.32.010. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW 29A.72.290.

The secretary of state's name may not appear in the voters' pamphlet in an official capacity if the secretary is a candidate for office during the same year. The secretary's name may only be included as part of the information normally included for candidates.

The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for each statewide issue on the ballot:

(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation or number;

(2) The official ballot title of the measure;

(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law as it presently exists;

(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;

(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29A.72.025;

(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed by the legislature;

(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;

(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on the ballot measure;

(10) The full text of the measure.

[ 2024 c 78 s 5; 2023 c 109 s 2; 2016 c 83 s 1; 2009 c 415 s 5. Prior: 2008 c 1 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 960, approved November 6, 2007); 2003 c 111 s 807; prior: 2002 c 139 s 2; 1999 c 260 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.81.250.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.

Findings—2023 c 109: "The legislature finds that making the act of casting a ballot as simple as possible will help promote the free and equal elections guaranteed by Article I, section 19 and Article VI, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution. The legislature recognizes that transparency and fiscal responsibility are important to the people of Washington, and that election administration and ballot design should reflect these long-held values. The legislature further finds that the people rightfully expect items on their ballots to be neutrally and accurately worded. Finally, the legislature finds for the votes that Washingtonians cast to have meaning, the ballot must be limited to candidate elections that give the people the power to choose their representatives or ballot measures that determine what laws and plan of government the state and its localities shall have." [ 2023 c 109 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—Construction—Severability—Subheadings and part headings not law—Short title—Effective date—2008 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 960): See notes following RCW 43.135.031.